Texas statutes.
INSURANCE CODE

TITLE 21. DISCOUNT HEALTH CARE PROGRAMS

CHAPTER 7002. SUPPLEMENTAL PROVISIONS RELATING TO DISCOUNT HEALTH CARE OPERATORS

Sec. 7002.001. DEFINITION. For purposes of Chapters 562 and 7001, Insurance Code, consideration provided to a discount health care program or a discount health care program operator includes patient information or patient prescription drug history provided by members, if the entity engages in the transfer or sale of such patient information, patient prescription drug history, or drug manufacturer rebates.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1245 (S.B. 2423), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 7002.002. REQUIRED DISCLOSURE. If a discount health care program operator engages in the transfer or sale of a member's patient information or patient prescription drug history, the program operator shall, before enrollment, provide each prospective member disclosure materials describing the program operator's practices regarding such transfer or sale.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1245 (S.B. 2423), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 7002.003. VIOLATION; PENALTIES. A violation of this chapter may be enforced in the same manner as a violation of Chapter 562 or 7001.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1245 (S.B. 2423), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 7002.004. EXEMPTION. This chapter does not apply to a health care sharing ministry operated under Chapter 1681.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 455 (S.B. 874), Sec. 6, eff. June 14, 2013.